es: Tamaño de gancho compatible: Métrico (mm); Mixto/universal; Agujas de ganchillo tunecino/afgano; Letra (EE. UU.); Número (EE. UU.); Otro
ro-RO: Dimensiune de croșetă compatibilă: Metric (mm); Mixt / universal; Croșete tunisiene/afgane; Litere SUA; Numere SUA; Altele
pt-PT: Tamanho de agulha compatível: Métrico (mm); Misto/universal; Agulhas tunisianas/afegãs; Letra dos EUA; Número dos EUA; Outro
ru: Совместимый размер крючка: Метрические (мм); Смешанные / универсальные; Тунисские / афганские крючки; США (буквы); США (цифры); Другое
ja: 対応フックサイズ: メートル法 (mm); 混合/ユニバーサル; チュニジアン/アフガン針; USレター; USナンバー; その他
bg-BG: Съвместим размер на куката: Метричен (мм); Смесен/Универсален; Тунизийски/афгански куки; US букви; US номера; Друго
vi: Kích thước lưỡi câu tương thích: Hệ mét (mm); Hỗn hợp/Phổ thông; Kim móc Tunisian/Afghan; Chữ cái (hệ Mỹ); Số (hệ Mỹ); Khác
hu: Kompatibilis hurokméret: Metrikus (mm); Vegyes/univerzális; Tuniszi/afgán horgolótűk; US betűjelzéses; US számjelzéses; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容魚鉤尺寸: 公制 (mm); 混合/通用; 突尼斯/阿富汗鉤針; 美制字母; 美制數字; 其他
nb: Kompatibel krokstørrelse: Metrisk (mm); Blandet/universell; Tunisiske/afghanske heklenåler; US Letter; US Number; Annet
fr: Taille d'hameçon compatible: Métrique (mm); Mixte/Universel; Crochets tunisiens/afghans; Lettre US; Numéro US; Autre
pl: Zgodna wielkość haka: Metryczne (mm); Mieszane / uniwersalne; Szydełka tunezyjskie; Amerykańskie literowe; Amerykańskie liczbowe; Inne
hr-HR: Kompatibilna veličina kuke: Metrički (mm); Miješano/univerzalno; Tuniške/afganistanske heklice; Američke oznake - slova; Američke oznake - brojevi; Ostalo
cs: Vhodná velikost háčku: Metrické (mm); Smíšené/univerzální; Tuniské/afghánské háčky; US písmena; US čísla; Jiné
el: Συμβατό μέγεθος αγκίστρου: Μετρικό (mm); Μεικτό/Γενικής χρήσης; Βελονάκια Τυνησίας/αφγανικά; US Letter; US Number; Άλλο
en: Compatible hook size: Metric (mm); Mixed/Universal; Tunisian/afghan hooks; US Letter; US Number; Other
zh-CN: 适用钩针尺寸: 公制 (mm); 混合/通用; 突尼斯/阿富汗钩针; 美制字母; 美制数字; 其他
tr: Uyumlu tığ boyutu: Metrik (mm); Karma/Evrensel; Tunus işi/Afgan tığları; ABD Harf; ABD Numara; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilná veľkosť vešiaka: Metrické (mm); Zmiešané/univerzálne; Tuniské/afganské háčiky; Americké (písmená); Americké (číslice); Iné
nl: Compatibele haakgrootte: Metrisch (mm); Gemengd/universeel; Tunesische/Afghaanse haaknaalden; US Letter; US Number; Overig
pt-BR: Tamanho do gancho compatível: Métrico (mm); Misto/Universal; Agulhas afegãs/tunisianas; Letras (EUA); Números (EUA); Outro
da: Kompatibel krogstørrelse: Metrisk (mm); Blandet/universel; Tunesiske/afghanske hæklenåle; Amerikansk bogstav; Amerikansk nummer; Andet
fi: Yhteensopiva koukun koko: Metrinen (mm); Yhdistelmä / yleinen; Tunisialaiset koukut; US-kirjain; US-numero; Muu
lt-LT: Suderinamo dydžio kabliukas: Metrinis (mm); Mišrus / universalus; Tuniso / afganiški vąšeliai; JAV raidinis; JAV skaitmeninis; Kita
sv: Kompatibel krokstorlek: Metrisk (mm); Blandad/universell; Tunisiska/afghanska virknålar; Bokstav (US); Siffra (US); Övrigt
de: Kompatible Hakengröße: Metrisch (mm); Gemischt/Universal; Tunesische Häkelnadeln; US-Letter; US-Nummer; Sonstige
ko: 호환 후크 크기: 미터법(mm); 혼합/범용; 튀니지안/아프간 바늘; US 문자; US 숫자; 기타
th: ขนาดเข็มโครเชต์ที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: เมตริก (มม.); คละแบบ/อเนกประสงค์; เข็มโครเชต์ตูนิเซีย/อัฟกัน; ตัวอักษร (US); ตัวเลข (US); อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Združljiva velikost kljuke: Metrično (mm); Mešano/univerzalno; Tunizijske kvačke; ZDA (črke); ZDA (številke); Drugo
it: Dimensioni dell'uncinetto compatibili: Metrica (mm); Mista/universale; Uncinetti tunisini/afgani; Lettera USA; Numero USA; Altro